Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.069

Judges—Filling vacancies resulting from creation of additional judgeships.

Unless otherwise provided, upon the taking effect of any act providing for additional judges of the superior court and thereby creating a vacancy, the governor shall appoint a person to hold the office until the election and qualification of a judge to fill the vacancy, which election shall be at the next succeeding general election, and the judge so elected shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

[ 1955 c 38 s 4; 1951 c 125 s 8.]

NOTES:

Vacancy, how filled: RCW 2.08.120.